Hawaii statutes.
§448E-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless otherwise indicated by the context:

"Board" means the board of
electricians and plumbers.

"Journey worker electrician" means
any person who has been licensed by the board as a journey worker electrician
to perform electrical work.

"Journey worker industrial
electrician" means any person who has been licensed by the board as a
journey worker industrial electrician to perform and maintain electrical work
related to substation, switchgear, automatic controls, and all other industrial
electrical work in existing industrial buildings and work places.

"Journey worker plumber" means any
person who has been licensed by the board as a journey worker plumber to direct
and supervise the performance of plumbing work and to perform plumbing work.

"Journey worker specialty
electrician" means any person who has been licensed by the board as a
journey worker specialty electrician to perform electrical work related to
installing, repairing, altering, and maintaining but not the attachment of
lighting and power circuits to, the following: electronic equipment, sound
public address systems, and communication systems, other than equipment and
systems for a single-family or two-family dwelling; master or community radio
and television receiving antenna systems; sound recording systems, other than
systems for a single-family or two-family dwelling; burglar and fire alarm
systems; low voltage remote control, other than a control for a single-family
or two-family dwelling; and low voltage communication signal systems.

"Maintenance electrician" means any
person who has been licensed by the board as a maintenance electrician to
maintain electrical work.

"Master plumber" means any person who
has been licensed by the board as a master plumber to direct and supervise the
performance of plumbing work and to perform plumbing work and who provides
overall supervision and general direction and is responsible for proper
installation of plumbing work.

"Supervising electrician" means any
person who has been licensed by the board as a supervising electrician to
direct and supervise the performance of electrical work and to perform
electrical work.

"Supervising industrial electrician"
means any person who has been licensed by the board as a supervising industrial
electrician to direct and supervise electrical work related to substation,
switchgear, automatic controls, and all other industrial electrical work in
existing industrial buildings and work places.

"Supervising specialty electrician"
means any person who has been licensed by the board as a supervising specialty
electrician to direct and supervise the performance of electrical work related
to installing, repairing, altering, and maintaining, but not the attachment of
lighting and power circuits, to the following: electronic equipment, sound
public address systems, other than equipment and systems for a single-family or
two-family dwelling; master or community radio and television receiving antenna
system; sound recording systems other than systems for a single-family or a
two-family dwelling; burglar and fire alarm systems; low voltage remote
control, other than control for a single-family or two-family dwelling; and low
voltage communication signal systems. [L 1971, c 183, pt of §1; am L 1972, c
196, §1; am L 1973, c 95, §1; am L 1974, c 27, §1; am L 1982, c 205, §1; am L
1983, c 56, §2; gen ch 1993]

Revision Note

Numeric designations deleted and definitions rearranged.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next